ru_RU.aff
SFX V Y 134
SFX V   ить   ью          [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьюсь        [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ить   ьём         [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьёмся       [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ить   ьёшь        [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьёшься      [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ить   ьёте        [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьётесь      [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ить   ьёт         [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьётся       [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ить   ьют         [бвлп]ить
SFX V   иться ьются       [бвлп]иться
SFX V   ть    ву          жить
SFX V   ться  вусь        житься
SFX V   ть    вём         жить
SFX V   ться  вёмся       житься
SFX V   ть    вёшь        жить
SFX V   ться  вёшься      житься
SFX V   ть    вёте        жить
SFX V   ться  вётесь      житься
SFX V   ть    вёт         жить
SFX V   ться  вётся       житься
SFX V   ть    вут         жить
SFX V   ться  вутся       житься
SFX V   евать ую          [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать уём         [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать уёшь        [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать уёте        [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать уёт         [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать уют         [жшщчц]евать
SFX V   еваться уётся       [жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться уются       [жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   евать юю          [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать юём         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать юёшь        [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать юёте        [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать юёт         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   евать юют         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX V   еваться ююсь        [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться юёмся       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться юёшься      [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться юётесь      [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться юётся       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   еваться юются       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX V   овать ую          овать
SFX V   овать уём         овать
SFX V   овать уёшь        овать
SFX V   овать уёте        овать
SFX V   овать уёт         овать
SFX V   овать уют         овать
SFX V   оваться уюсь        оваться
SFX V   оваться уёмся       оваться
SFX V   оваться уёшься      оваться
SFX V   оваться уётесь      оваться
SFX V   оваться уётся       оваться
SFX V   оваться уются       оваться
SFX V   ть    ну          деть
SFX V   ться  нусь        деться
SFX V   ть    нем         деть
SFX V   ться  немся       деться
SFX V   ть    нешь        деть
SFX V   ться  нешься      деться
SFX V   ть    нете        деть
SFX V   ться  нетесь      деться
SFX V   ть    нет         деть
SFX V   ться  нется       деться
SFX V   ть    нут         деть
SFX V   ться  нутся       деться
SFX V   ть    ю           уть
SFX V   ться  юсь         уться
SFX V   ть    ем          уть
SFX V   ться  емся        уться
SFX V   ть    ешь         уть
SFX V   ться  ешься       уться
SFX V   ть    ете         уть
SFX V   ться  етесь       уться
SFX V   ть    ет          уть
SFX V   ться  ется        уться
SFX V   ть    ют          уть
SFX V   ться  ются        уться
SFX V   хать  ду          хать
SFX V   хаться дусь        хаться
SFX V   хать  дем         хать
SFX V   хаться демся       хаться
SFX V   хать  дешь        хать
SFX V   хаться дешься      хаться
SFX V   хать  дете        хать
SFX V   хаться детесь      хаться
SFX V   хать  дет         хать
SFX V   хаться дется       хаться
SFX V   хать  дут         хать
SFX V   хаться дутся       хаться
SFX V   ать   лю          пать
SFX V   аться люсь        паться
SFX V   ать   лем         пать
SFX V   аться лемся       паться
SFX V   ать   лешь        пать
SFX V   аться лешься      паться
SFX V   ать   лете        пать
SFX V   аться летесь      паться
SFX V   ать   лет         пать
SFX V   аться лется       паться
SFX V   ать   лют         пать
SFX V   аться лются       паться
SFX V   ечь   ягу         лечь
SFX V   ечься ягусь       лечься
SFX V   ечь   яжем        лечь
SFX V   ечься яжемся      лечься
SFX V   ечь   яжешь       лечь
SFX V   ечься яжешься     лечься
SFX V   ечь   яжете       лечь
SFX V   ечься яжетесь     лечься
SFX V   ечь   яжет        лечь
SFX V   ечься яжется      лечься
SFX V   ечь   ягут        лечь
SFX V   ечься ягутся      лечься
SFX V   ять   ю           ять
SFX V   ять   ём          ять
SFX V   ять   ёшь         ять
SFX V   ять   ёте         ять
SFX V   ять   ёт          ять
SFX V   ять   ют          ять
SFX V   яться юсь         яться
SFX V   яться ёмся        яться
SFX V   яться ёшься       яться
SFX V   яться ётесь       яться
SFX V   яться ётся        яться
SFX V   яться ются        яться
SFX V   ать   у           дать
SFX V   ать   ем          дать
SFX V   ать   ешь         дать
SFX V   ать   ете         дать
SFX V   ать   ет          дать
SFX V   ать   ут          дать
