ru_RU.dic
бить/LV
биться/LV
блевать/LQTV
вдеть/LRV
вдуть/LRV
вжиться/LRV
вздеть/LRV
вздуть/LRV
взъехать/LRV
вить/LV
виться/LV
воздеть/LRV
возжаждать/LRV
возлечь/V
всыпать/BLMPRV
въехать/LRV
выдуть/LRV
выехать/LRV
выждать/LRV
высыпать/BLMPRV
выщипать/LMRV
деть/LV
деться/LV
добить/LRV
добиться/LRV
доехать/LRV
дожевать/LRTV
дожить/LRV
долить/LRV
допить/LRV
допиться/LRV
досыпать/LMRV
дуть/LV
дуться/LV
ехать/LRV
жаждать/LV
жевать/LQTV
жить/LV
забить/LRV
забиться/LRV
заблевать/LRV
завить/LRV
завиться/LRV
задеть/LRV
задуть/LRV
заехать/LRV
зажевать/LRV
зажить/LRV
зажиться/LRV
заклевать/LRV
заковать/LRTV
залечь/V
залить/LRV
залиться/LRV
запить/LRV
заплевать/LRV
засмеять/LRV
засмеяться/LRTV
засыпать/BLMPRV
засыпаться/LMPRV
защипать/LMRV
изжевать/LRTV
изжить/LRV
исклевать/LRV
исплеваться/LRV
истрепать/LRV
истрепаться/LRV
клевать/LQTV
клеваться/LQTV
ковать/LQTV
крапать/BLMPV
лечь/V
лить/LV
набить/LRV
набиться/LRV
надеть/LRV
надуть/LRV
надуться/LRV
наехать/LRV
нажиться/LRV
налечь/V
налить/LRV
налиться/LRV
напиться/LRV
наплевать/LRTV
наплеваться/LRV
насмеяться/LRV
насовать/LRV
насыпать/BLMPRV
натрепаться/LRV
нащипать/LMRV
недосыпать/LMPRV
обдуть/LRV
обжить/LRV
обжиться/LRV
обклевать/LRV
облевать/LRV
обсмеять/LRV
обсыпаться/LMPRV
обтрепаться/LRV
общипать/LRV
объехать/LRV
одеть/LRV
одеться/LRV
ожить/LRV
оковать/LRTV
оплевать/LRTV
осмеять/LRV
основать/LRTV
основаться/LRTV
осыпать/LMPRV
осыпаться/LMPRV
отжевать/LRTV
отжить/LRV
отклевать/LRV
отковать/LRTV
отплеваться/LRV
отрепать/LRV
отсыпать/LMPRV
отъехать/LRV
ощипать/LMRV
перебить/LRV
перебиться/LRV
перевить/LRV
переехать/LRV
пережевать/LRTV
пережить/LRV
переклевать/LRV
перековать/LRTV
перековаться/LRV
перелечь/V
перелить/LRV
переодеть/LRV
переодеться/LRV
перепить/LRV
перепиться/LRV
пересыпать/BLMPRV
пить/LV
питься/LV
плевать/LQTV
плеваться/LQTV
побить/LRV
побиться/LRV
поддеть/LRV
подковать/LRTV
подналечь/V
подсмеяться/LRV
подсыпать/BLMPRV
подуть/LRV
подъехать/LRV
поехать/LRV
пожевать/LRTV
пожить/LRV
поклевать/LRTV
полечь/V
полить/LRV
политься/LRV
полузасыпать/LRV
понабить/LRV
попить/LRV
поплевать/LRTV
посмеяться/LRTV
посыпать/BLMPRV
посыпаться/LMPRV
потрепать/LRV
потрепаться/LRV
пощипать/BLMRV
прибить/LRV
прибиться/LRV
привить/LRV
приехать/LRV
прижить/LV
прижиться/LRV
приковать/LRTV
прилечь/V
прилить/LRV
приналечь/V
приодеть/LRV
приодеться/LRV
присыпать/LMPRV
пробить/LRV
пробиться/LRV
продеть/LRV
продуть/LRV
продуться/LRV
проехать/LRV
проехаться/LRV
прожевать/LRTV
прожить/LRV
пролечь/V
пролить/LRV
пропить/LRV
просыпать/LMPRV
раздеть/LRV
раздеться/LRV
раздуть/LRV
раздуться/LRV
разжевать/LRTV
разжиться/LRV
разлечься/V
разодеть/LRV
разодеться/LRV
разъехаться/LRV
расклевать/LRV
расковать/LRV
расковаться/LRV
расплеваться/LRV
рассмеяться/LRTV
рассовать/LRV
рассыпать/BLMPRV
рассыпаться/BLMPRV
растрепать/LRV
сдуть/LRV
сжевать/LRTV
сжить/LRV
сжиться/LRV
склевать/LRV
сковать/LRTV
слечь/V
смеяться/LPTV
сновать/LQTV
совать/LQTV
соваться/LQTV
ссыпать/BLMPRV
ссыпаться/LMPRV
съехать/LRV
съехаться/LRV
сыпать/LV
трепать/LV
трепаться/LV
убить/LRV
убиться/LRV
увить/LRV
уехать/LRV
ужиться/LRV
улечься/V
упиться/LRV
усыпать/LMPRV
усыпаться/LMPRV
щипать/BLMPV
щипаться/BLMPV
